Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1416
Justification an
affirmative defense; available
in certain civil actions.

(1) In any
prosecution based on conduct which is justifiable under sections 28-1406 to
28-1416, justification is an affirmative defense.

(2) The justification
defenses provided for under sections 28-1406 to 28-1416 shall be available
in any civil action for assault and battery or intentional wrongful death
and, where applicable, shall be a bar to recovery.

Laws 1972, LB 895, § 11;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-843, (1975);

Laws 2012, LB804, § 1.